Indiana, session 2026, HB1339.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 3-5-2.1-84, AS ADDED BY P.L.186-2025,
SECTION 6, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 84. (a) Except as provided in subsection
subsections (b) and (c), "proof of identification" refers to a document
that satisfies all the following:
(1) The document shows the name of the individual to whom the
document was issued, and the name conforms to the name in the
individual's voter registration record.
(2) The document shows a photograph of the individual to whom
the document was issued.
(3) The document includes an expiration date, and the document:
(A) is not expired; or
(B) expired after the date of the most recent general election.
(4) The document was issued by the United States or the state of
Indiana.
(b) Notwithstanding subsection (a)(3), a document issued by the
United States Department of Defense, the United States Department of
2026 IN 1339—LS 6029/DI 144


Veterans Affairs (or its predecessor, the Veterans Administration), a
branch of the uniformed services, the Merchant Marine, the Indiana
National Guard, or a Native American Indian tribe or band recognized
by the United States government that:
(1) otherwise complies with the requirements of subsection (a);
and
(2) has no expiration date or states that the document has an
indefinite expiration date;
is sufficient proof of identification for purposes of this title.
(c) Notwithstanding subsection (a)(4), a REAL ID driver's
license or identification card (as defined in 6 CFR 37.3) that
complies with the requirements of subsection (a)(1) through (a)(3)
is sufficient proof of identification for purposes of this title.
(c) (d) The term does not include a document issued by an
educational institution.
2026 IN 1339—LS 6029/DI 144